Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.050

Persons subject to the requirement of a certificate of authority or approval under this title.

(1) A person may not engage in unauthorized trust activity in this state.

(2) As a condition of engaging in trust business in this state, an out-of-state trust institution is required to obtain approval from the director and is subject to all other requirements of chapter 30B.38 RCW.

(3) As a condition of engaging in trust business in this state, a person, other than an out-of-state trust institution or an exempt person under RCW 30B.04.040, is required to organize and obtain a certificate of authority as a state trust company pursuant to chapter 30B.08 RCW.

(4) A person who violates the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section, as applicable, engages in unauthorized trust activity and is subject to enforcement by the director as set forth in chapter 30B.10 RCW.

[ 2014 c 37 s 307.]